Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.600

Domestic violence high risk teams—Pilot program.

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall administer a pilot program to implement domestic violence high risk teams. A domestic violence high risk team must, at a minimum, include the following four elements:

(a) Early identification of the most dangerous cases through evidence-based lethality assessments;

(b) Increased access to supportive services for high-risk victims;

(c) Increased perpetrator monitoring and accountability; and

(d) A coordinated response to high-risk cases through a multidisciplinary team.

(2) A domestic violence program must be the lead or co-lead of the domestic violence high risk teams.

[ 2023 c 462 s 601.]